Utah statutes.
53A-24-205.   Appointment of advisory council.

(1)  The board shall appoint an advisory council to advise the office, DRS, and, as appropriate, the board concerning the need of individuals with disabilities and the activities of DRS regarding vocational rehabilitation services.

(2)  A majority of the membership of the advisory council shall consist of individuals with  disabilities.

(3)  Members may be reimbursed for authorized actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.



Amended by Chapter 37, 1996 General Session

